Vermont, session 2025-2026, H116.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2941 is amended to read:
§ 2941. LIMITATIONS OF CONTRIBUTIONS
(a) In any election cycle:
(1)(A) A candidate for State Representative or for local office shall not
accept contributions totaling more than:
(i) $1,000.00 from a single source; or
VT LEG #379132 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.116
2025 Page 2 of 4
(ii) $1,000.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
(2)(A) A candidate for State Senator or for county office shall not accept
contributions totaling more than:
(i) $1,500.00 from a single source; or
(ii) $1,500.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
(3)(A) A candidate for State Representative shall not accept
contributions totaling more than:
(i) $1,000.00 from a single source, including contributions made
by a candidate to the candidate’s own campaign;
(ii) $1,000.00 from a political committee; or
(iii) $1,000.00 from a political party.
(B) Such a candidate shall not accept contributions totaling more than
$29,000.00 from all sources in an election cycle.
(4)(A) A candidate for State Senator shall not accept contributions
totaling more than:
(i) $1,500.00 from a single source, including contributions made
by a candidate to the candidate’s own campaign;
VT LEG #379132 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.116
2025 Page 3 of 4
(ii) $1,500.00 from a political committee; or
(iii) $1,500.00 from a political party.
(B) Such a candidate shall not accept contributions totaling more than
$29,000.00 from all sources in an election cycle.
(3)(5)(A) A candidate for the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor,
Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Auditor of Accounts, or Attorney General
shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(i) $4,000.00 from a single source; or
(ii) $4,000.00 from a political committee.
(B) Such a candidate may accept unlimited contributions from a
political party.
(4)(6) A political committee shall not accept contributions totaling more
than:
(A) $4,000.00 from a single source;
(B) $4,000.00 from a political committee; or
(C) $4,000.00 from a political party.
(5)(7) A political party shall not accept contributions totaling more than:
(A) $10,000.00 from a single source;
(B) $10,000.00 from a political committee; or
(C) $60,000.00 from a political party.
(6) [Repealed.]
VT LEG #379132 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.116
2025 Page 4 of 4
* * *
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2947 is amended to read:
§ 2947. CONTRIBUTIONS FROM A CANDIDATE
This subchapter shall not be interpreted to limit the amount a candidate may
contribute to his or her own campaign The provisions of this subchapter shall
be interpreted to limit the amount a candidate for State Representative or State
Senator, but not any candidate for other offices, may contribute to the
candidate’s own campaign.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379132 v.1